California, session 20252026, AB1283.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8619.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:8619.6. The Office of Emergency Services shall establish the Firefighting Mutual Aid and Prepositioning Program for all of the following purposes:(a) To support the implementation of the state’s fire service and rescue emergency mutual aid program.(b) To support the Mutual Aid Fire Engine Program, which permits the use of the engine for mutual aid responses, local multiple alarm fires, temporary replacement for out-of-service engines, training, or other local needs and requires the assignee to dispatch the engine with the required personnel to any emergency. (c) To augment the Mutual Aid Fire Engine Program by reimbursing costs to staff, train, and acquire additional fire suppression resources, including, but not limited to, super hose tenders, deployable, auxiliary water suppression systems and mobile hydrants for local agencies and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL-FIRE).(d) To establish a reimbursement program to allow firefighting agencies deployed under the state’s Master Mutual Aid Agreement to pay for costs to deploy when assisting other agencies during an emergency, including, but not limited to, salaries, overtime, backfill, lodging, food, fuel, personal protective equipment, and specialty response and support equipment. ___________________ CORRECTIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________